Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4401.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 19 of Chapter 21A shall be amended by inserting the following:
(c) A licensed hazardous waste site cleanup professional shall provide written notification
to the City or Town Clerk in the municipality where the site is located, by certified mail, within 7
days of the notification of the agency, federal or state requires posting of the known
contamination at the location. The Town or city clerk is required to maintain a database of all
locations of which they have received notification of contamination by property address and
make the database available to the public.
of 2

Failure to comply with this section shall result in a fine of $1000 for the first offense,
$2500 for any further offenses and up to 2 ½ years confinement in the house of correction or
both.
of 2